District of Columbia statutes.
36-129

Type of containers to which law is applicable.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to all bottles, cans, crates, and other containers in which milk or cream of any grade, quality, or character is sold or offered for sale and shall include bottles, cans, crates, and other containers in which skimmed milk, buttermilk, double cream, and sour milk are sold.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 811, ch. 737, § 9
1981 Ed., § 48-209.
1973 Ed., § 48-209.